apertium-si-ta.si.dix
	<pardef n="පූස/__n">
		<e><p><l>ා</l><r> ා<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l> ෝ</l><r> ා<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l> ෙක්</l><r> ා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l> ෙකු</l><r> ා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l> ෝ</l><r> ා<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l> ෙක්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ාගේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ාට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
	
	<pardef n="මිදුල/__n">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ක්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ක</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ෙන්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l> ්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="අවුරු/ද්ද__n">
		<e><p><l>ද්ද</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ද්දක්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ද්දක</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ද්දේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ද්දට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ද්දෙන්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>දු</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="ජනේල/ය__n">
		<e><p><l>ය</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යක්</l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>යක</l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ේ</l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>යට</l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ෙන්</l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>ය<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="ක්‍රීඩා/ව__n">
		<e><p><l>ව</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වක්</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වක</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වේ</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වට</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වෙන්</l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>ව<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="නි/වස__n">
		<e><p><l>වස</l><r>වස<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වසක්</l><r>වස<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වසක</l><r>වස<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වසේ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වසට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>වසෙන්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වාස</l><r>වස<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>වාසයන්</l><r>වස<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="අද/__n">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	
	
		<!-- SECTION: Verbs -->
		
		<pardef n="ක/රන__vblex">
			<e><p><l>රන</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රන්න</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රමින්</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රමි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>‍ෙරුවෙමි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රමු</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ෙරුවෙමු</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රයි</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>රති</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ෙරුවා</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ළ</l><r>රන<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		
		<pardef n="සිටි/න__vblex">
			<e><p><l>න</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>න්න</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>මින්</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>මි</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>මු</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>යි</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ති</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		
		<pardef n="ව/න__vblex">
			<e><p><l>න</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>වී</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>න්න</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l> ෙමු</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ෙරුවෙමු</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l> ෙයි</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l> ෙති</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ිය</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ූ</l><r>න<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<!-- SECTION: Auxiliary Verbs -->
		<pardef n="හැකි/__vaux">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		
    <!--SECTION: Abverbs-->
		
		<pardef n="ඇත/__adv">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ි</l><r><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	
		<pardef n="කොහෙ/ද__adv">
			<e><p><l></l><r>ද<s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ද</l><r>ද<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
   
    <pardef n="කවු/ද__adv">
			<e><p><l>රු</l><r>ද<s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ද</l><r>ද<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
 
 		<pardef n="ඉදිරිපස/__adv">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ින්</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		 																		
 		<pardef n="දැ/__adv">
			<e><p><l>න්</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>නට</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
 		
 		<pardef n="එ/විට__adv">
			<e><p><l>විට</l><r>විට<s n="adv"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
 																		
 		<pardef n="තු/ළ__adv">
 			<e><p><l>ළ</l><r>ළ<s n="adv"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ළින්</l><r>ළ<s n="adv"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ළට</l><r>ළ<s n="n"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
 		
 		
    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->      
    <pardef n="සහ/__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	  
	  <!--SECTION: Preposition-->
	  <pardef n="නො/__pr">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	  
		<!--SECTION: Postposition-->
		<pardef n="ද/__post">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	
	<!--CLITICS-->
	
	<pardef n="clitic_to">
		<e><p><l>ට</l><r><j/>ට<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="clitic_from">
		<e><p><l>ගෙන්</l><r><j/>ගෙන්<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	

		<e lm="නි"><i>නි</i><par n="නි/වස__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ජනේලය"><i>ජනේල</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ගස"><i>ගස</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="අද"><i>අද</i><par n="අද/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ඊයේ"><i>ඊයේ</i><par n="අද/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="කාළගුණය"><i>කාළගුණය</i><par n="අද/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="එළිමහන"><i>එළිමහන</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="අවුරුදු"><i>අවුරු</i><par n="අවුරු/ද්ද__n"/></e>
		<e lm="පූසා"><i>පූස</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="බල්ලා"><i>බල්ල</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="පිළිතුර"><i>පිළිතුර</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="හිස"><i>හිස</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="සතා"><i>සත</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ශබ්දය"><i>ශබ්ද</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="සහෝදරිය"><i>සහෝදරිය</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="තැන"><i>තැන</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="වතුර"><i>වතුර</i><par n="අද/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="වටපිට"><i>වටපිට</i><par n="අද/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="මේසය"><i>මේස</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ඇස"><i>ඇස</i><par n="මිදුල/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="කුරුල්ලා"><i>කුරුල්ල</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="දරුවා"><i>දරුව</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="දැරිය"><i>දැරිය</i><par n="පූස/__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ක්‍රීඩාව"><i>ක්‍රීඩා</i><par n="ක්‍රීඩා/ව__n"/></e>
		<e lm="කාලය"><i>කාල</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ප්‍රශ්නය"><i>ප්‍රශ්න</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="පුටු"><i>පුටු</i><par n="ජනේල/ය__n"/></e>
		<e lm="සෙල්ලම් කරන"><i>සෙල්ලම් ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="දකින"><i>දකි</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="වන"><i>ව</i><par n="ව/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="දන්"><i>දන්</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="කතා කරන"><i>කතා ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="සොයන"><i>සොය</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="සිතන"><i>සි</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="සැග වන"><i>සැග ව</i><par n="ව/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ගණන් කරන"><i>ගණන් ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="දුව"><i>දුව</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="දෙන"><i>දෙ</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="උත්සාහ කරන"><i>උත්සාහ ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="පානය කරන"><i>පානය ක</i><par n="ක/රන__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="ඇවිද"><i>ඇවිද</i><par n="සිටි/න__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="යුතු"><i>යුතු</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="බව"><i>බව</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="ඇයි"><i>ඇයි</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="කුමක්"><i>කුමක්</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="දැයි"><i>දැයි</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="දෙස"><i>දෙස</i><par n="හැකි/__vaux"/></e>
		<e lm="ඉදිරිපස"><i>ඉදිරිපස</i><par n="ඉදිරිපස/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="පිටුපස"><i>පිටුපස</i><par n="ඉදිරිපස/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කොහෙ"><i>කොහෙ</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කොහොම"><i>කොහොම</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කවදා"><i>කවදා</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කීයට"><i>කීයට</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කාට"><i>කාට</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="කවු"><i>කවු</i><par n="කවු/ද__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="දැ"><i>දැ</i><par n="දැ/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="තුළ"><i>තුළ</i><par n="තු/ළ__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="ළග"><i>ළග</i><par n="තු/ළ__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="එවිට"><i>එ</i><par n="එ/විට__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="මෙවිට"><i>මෙ</i><par n="එ/විට__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="සැමවිට"><i>සැම</i><par n="එ/විට__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="වෙත"><i>වෙත</i><par n="තු/ළ__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="යට"><i>යට</i><par n="ඉදිරිපස/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="බොහෝවිට"><i>බොහෝ</i><par n="එ/විට__adv"/></e>
		<e lm=""><i></i><par n="එ/විට__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="ඇත"><i></i><par n="ඇත/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="නැත"><i></i><par n="ඇත/__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="තව"><i>කාට</i><par n="කොහෙ/ද__adv"/></e>
		 <e lm="හා"><i>හා</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
		 <e lm="හෝ"><i>හෝ</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
	   <e lm="නමුත්"><i>නමුත්</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
	   <e lm="ඉතින්"><i>ඉතින්</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
	   <e lm="සමග"><i>සමග</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
	   <e lm="අතර"><i>සමග</i><par n="සහ/__cnjcoo"/></e>
	   <e lm="නො"><i>නො</i><par n="නො/__pr"/></e>
	   <e lm="ද"><i>ද</i><par n="ද/__post"/></e>
		 <e lm="යි"><i>ද</i><par n="ද/__post"/></e>
		 <e lm="ය"><i>ද</i><par n="ද/__post"/></e>
